California, session 20252026, SB345.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13157 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:13157. The California Fire Service Training and Education Program is hereby established in the office of the State Fire Marshal.The State Fire Marshal, with policy guidance and advice from the State Board of Fire Services, shall carry out the management of the California Fire Service Training and Education Program and shall have the authority to do all of the following:(a) Promulgate and adopt rules and regulations necessary for implementation of the program.(b) Establish the courses of study and curriculum to be used in the program.(c) Establish prerequisites for the admission of personnel who attend courses offered in the program.(d) (1) Establish and collect admission fees and other fees that may be necessary to be charged for seminars, conferences, and specialized training given, consistent with the terms of paragraph (2).(2) The State Fire Marshal may establish and collect admission fees and other fees as described in paragraph (1) only to the extent that state appropriations and other funding sources for those seminars, conferences, and specialized training are insufficient to cover the necessary costs of those seminars, conferences, and specialized training. (e)  Collect those fees as may be established pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 13159.8.SEC. 2. Section 13159.8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:13159.8. The State Fire Marshal, with policy guidance and advice from the State Board of Fire Services, shall:(a) Establish and validate recommended minimum standards for fire protection personnel and fire protection instructors at all career levels.(b) Develop course curricula for arson, fire technology, and apprenticeship training for use in academies, colleges, and other educational institutions.(c) Develop, validate, update, copyright, and maintain security over a complete series of promotional examinations based on the minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (a).(d) Have the authority to make the examinations developed pursuant to subdivision (c) available to any agency of the state, to any political subdivision within the state, or to any other testing organization, as the State Fire Marshal deems appropriate.(e) (1) Establish any fees that are necessary to implement this section, consistent with the terms of paragraph (2). However, the State Fire Marshal shall not establish or collect any fees for training classes provided by the State Fire Marshal to fire protection personnel relating to state laws and regulation that local fire services are authorized or required to enforce.(2) The State Fire Marshal may establish fees pursuant to paragraph (1) only to the extent that state appropriations and other funding sources for the purposes of implementing this section are insufficient to cover the necessary costs of implementing this section.(f) Promote, sponsor, and administer the California Fire Academy System.(g) Establish procedures for seeking, accepting, and administering gifts and grants for use in implementing the intents and purposes of the California Fire and Arson Training Act.(h) The recommended minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to any agency of the state or any agency of any political subdivision within the state unless that agency elects to be subject to these standards.